Georgia statutes. TITLE 8 Buildings and Housing
Subpart 3 Destruction of Manufactured Homes

8-2-187.
Certificate of Destruction and requirements for issuance.

When a home which has previously become real property has been or is to be destroyed, the owner of the real property and the holders of all security interests therein shall execute and file a Certificate of Destruction:

With the commissioner; and

In the real estate records of the county where the real property is located.

The Certificate of Destruction shall be in a form prescribed by the commissioner and shall include:

The name and address of the owner;

The names and addresses of the holders of any security interest and of any lien;

The title number formerly assigned to the home, if applicable;

A description of the real estate on which the home was previously located, including the name of the owner and a reference by deed book and page number to the recording of the former Certificate of Permanent Location;

Verification of the destruction by a law enforcement officer; and

Any other data the commissioner prescribes.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-187

, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 430, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 334, § 3-1/HB 501; Ga. L. 2006, p. 702, § 1/SB 253.

8-2-188.
Retention of titles by commissioner.

Upon receipt of a properly executed Certificate of Destruction, the commissioner shall file and retain a copy of such certificate together with all other prior title records related to the home.

When a Certificate of Destruction is so filed, the commissioner shall issue to the filing party the original of the Certificate of Destruction containing thereon confirmation by the commissioner that the Certificate of Destruction has been so filed.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-188

, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 430, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 334, § 3-1/HB 501; Ga. L. 2006, p. 702, § 1/SB 253.

8-2-189.
Requirements for filing with clerk of superior court.

The clerk of superior court shall not accept a Certificate of Destruction for filing unless the Certificate of Destruction contains thereon the confirmation by the commissioner that the Certificate of Destruction has been filed with the commissioner.

When a Certificate of Destruction is properly filed with the clerk of superior court, the clerk shall record such certificate in the same manner as other instruments affecting the real property described in the Certificate of Destruction and shall charge and collect the fees usually charged for recording deeds and other instruments relating to real estate. Such certificate shall be indexed under the name of the current owner of the real property in both the grantor and grantee indexes.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-2-189

, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 430, § 1; Ga. L. 2004, p. 631, § 8; Ga. L. 2005, p. 334, § 3-1/HB 501; Ga. L. 2006, p. 702, § 1/SB 253.